Washington statutes.
RCW 33.44.125

Waiver of chapter requirements.

If, in the opinion of the director of financial institutions, it is necessary for any of the requirements of this chapter to be waived in order to permit an association which is in danger of failing to convert its charter to that of a commercial bank or a savings bank so that the association may be acquired by a commercial bank or a savings bank or a bank holding company, then the director may waive any such requirement.

[ 1994 c 92 s 469; 1982 c 3 s 78.]

NOTES:

Severability—1982 c 3: See note following RCW 33.04.002.